Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.050

Record of proceedings.

The secretary shall keep an official record of all proceedings, a part of which record shall consist of a register of all applicants for certification under this chapter, with the result of each application.

[ 1991 c 3 s 206; 1987 c 412 s 6.]